Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
GROUP AND BLANKET DISABILITY INSURANCE

Attorney General Opinions

Section 431:10A-601 applied to all parts of article 10A if
the category of policy under consideration included family coverage, as defined
in §431:10A-103. Att. Gen. Op. 97-10.

§431:10A-201 Definitions. For the
purposes of this article:

"Blanket disability insurance policy"
means any policy or contract of accident and health or sickness insurance which
does not require individual applications for covered persons and is:

(1) A policy issued to any common carrier of
passengers, which shall be deemed the policyholder, that covers a group defined
as all persons who may become passengers who shall be insured against loss or
damage resulting from death or bodily injury either while or as a result of
being passengers;

(2) A policy issued in the name of any volunteer fire
department, first aid or ambulance squad, or volunteer police organization,
which shall be deemed the policyholder, that covers all the members of the
policyholder organization against loss from accidents resulting from hazards
incidental to duties in connection with such organizations;

(3) A policy issued in the name of any established
organization, whether incorporated or not, that is recognized by the community
as being operated for the welfare of the community and its members and not for
profit, which shall be deemed the policyholder, that covers all volunteer
workers who serve without pecuniary compensation and the members of the
organization against loss from accidents occurring while engaged in the actual
performance of duties or activities of the policyholder organization;

(4) A policy issued to an employer, who shall be
deemed the policyholder, that covers any group of employees defined by
reference to exceptional hazards incident to employment and that insures
employees against death or bodily injury resulting from or caused by exposure
to exceptional hazards;

(5) A policy issued to a college, school, institute
of learning, or to the head or principal of a college, school, or institute of
learning, which or who shall be deemed the policyholder, that covers students
or employees; or

(6) A policy issued to a substantially similar group that,
pursuant to the discretion of the commissioner, may be properly eligible for
blanket disability insurance;

provided that a blanket disability insurance policy
shall not affect the liability of policyholders for the death of or injury to,
any such member of such group.

"Employees" means the compensated
officers, managers, and employees of the employer and of subsidiary or
affiliated corporations of a corporation employer, the individual proprietors,
partners, and employees of individuals and firms of which the business is under
common control through stock ownership, contract, or otherwise, the individual
proprietor or partners if the employer is an individual proprietor or a partnership
and if specified by the policy, and retired employees.

"Employer" means any municipal
corporation or governmental unit, agency, or department as well as private
individuals, firms, corporations, and other persons.

"Group disability insurance" means
that form of accident and health or sickness insurance covering groups of
persons, with or without their dependents and family members, and issued under
a master policy to:

(1) Groups that qualify for group life insurance
under sections 431:10D-201 to 431:10D-211 and 431:10D-211.5 of this code; or

(2) An automobile club formed for purposes other than
obtaining group insurance that covers the members of the club. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §60; am L 2010, c 32, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next